New York, session 2025-2026, S2050.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 3-202 of the election law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. The term of office of an election commissioner shall be [two] four 4 years beginning January first of each odd numbered year [except that in 5 the city of New York and the county of Schenectady the term shall be 6 four years beginning on January first of each alternate odd numbered 7 year. The county legislative body of any other county may determine that 8 the commissioners of elections thereafter appointed shall serve for a 9 term of four years. Such determination may be rescinded by a subsequent 10 action of the county legislative body which shall take effect at the 11 expiration of the terms of the commissioners then in office]. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 13 elections occurring on and after November 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01875-01-5